California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
In any case in which the board of supervisors determines, after investigation, that the purposes of this part will be served by releasing or subordinating any lien in whole or in part or reconveying or subordinating in whole or in part any interest or estate transferred or granted to the board of supervisors under the provisions of Section 17109 or under the provisions of Section 9 of an act entitled “An act to provide for the aid and relief of indigents,” approved June 5, 1933, and determines that the property affected by such lien, transfer or grant, except such interest or estate as may have been conveyed to the county, is at the time owned by the recipient of aid, the board of supervisors may release such lien in whole or in part or may reconvey such interest or estate in whole or in part or may subordinate the lien, interest or estate so transferred or granted to it to one or more designated encumbrances executed by the recipient of aid, without consideration or for such consideration as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17408.

The releases, reconveyances and subordinations herein provided for shall be authorized by a resolution of the board of supervisors, and the instruments of release, reconveyance, or subordination shall be executed by an officer of the county, designated by the board of supervisors, in the name of the county and the State of California, and any release, reconveyance or subordination authorized by the board of supervisors and executed by the designated county officer shall conclusively bind the county and the state in favor of any bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17409.

There shall be exempt from the transfers and grants authorized by Section 17109 and from execution on claims under Section 17403 against property acquired by persons for the support of whom public moneys have been expended all of the following property:

(a) Cash not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) Personal effects and household furniture not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in value.

(c) An interment space, crypt, or niche intended for the interment of the applicant or recipient of aid.

(d) Funds placed in trust for funeral or burial expenses not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(e) Insurance policies having an actual cash surrender value not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(f) Real or personal property of a recipient of public assistance, with respect to aid or county hospital care.

(g) For a period of six months from the date of receipt, the compensation received from a public entity which acquires for a public use a dwelling actually owned and occupied by the recipient. Such compensation shall be exempt in the amount, over and above all liens and encumbrances, provided by Section 704.730 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) Relocation benefits shall be exempt as provided by Section 704.180 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

No county shall withhold emergency medical or hospital care from any person pending the person giving security for reimbursement to the county for the care or hospitalization to be provided to the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 379, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17410.

Any person who with the intent to defraud, buys or receives a voucher, invoice, or similar document issued for services or merchandise under this part without furnishing such services or merchandise is punishable either by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year, by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of not more than one year, by a fine of not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 633.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Unemployed or Displaced Workers [17500. - 17501.]

17500.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to encourage certain counties to provide preventative support services to unemployed and displaced workers for the following purposes:

(a) To enable unemployed workers and their families to maintain stability in their lives.

(b) To bring together the resources and skills of the public and private sector to aid unemployed workers and their families.

(c) To help prevent the emotional crisis often resulting from unemployment from leading to more serious and disabling health and mental health problems, including homelessness and suicide.

(d) To help unemployed workers and their families avoid dependency upon public assistance programs.

(e) To encourage a cooperative effort between the Employment Development Department and other local public and private services in providing supportive services to unemployed workers and their families.

(f) The services provided pursuant to this chapter are to be carried out through coordination with the service delivery area, as designated pursuant to Section 15005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, and shall be consistent with the appropriate service delivery area plan and employment and training plan for displaced workers, as described in Sections 15043 and 15076, respectively, of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17501.

(a) A county may, upon the affirmative vote of the board of supervisors, elect to contract with a contracting agency for services which provide counseling and referral and resource information services that conform to the purposes listed in Section 17500.

(b) The services provided under contract may include:

(1) Telephone crisis counseling.

(2) Development and publication of resource guides.

(3) Direct supportive counseling.

(c) The services provided under contract may not include direct financial assistance to clients.

(d) The direct services provided under contract shall be delivered at or near the local Employment Development Department offices or other related public service sites.

(e) The contractor shall be encouraged to use volunteer resources in service delivery to the maximum extent possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. State and Local Fund Allocations [17600. - 17613.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Funding Allocations [17600. - 17600.60.]

17600.

(a) There is hereby created the Local Revenue Fund, which shall consist of the following accounts:

(1) The Sales Tax Account.

(2) The Vehicle License Fee Account.

(3) The Vehicle License Collection Account.

(4) The Sales Tax Growth Account.

(5) The Vehicle License Fee Growth Account.

(b) The Sales Tax Account shall have all of the following subaccounts:

(1) The Mental Health Subaccount.

(2) The Social Services Subaccount.

(3) The Health Subaccount.

(4) The CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount.

(5) The Family Support Subaccount.

(6) The Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount.

(7) The County Medical Services Program Subaccount.

(c) The Vehicle License Fee Account shall have all of the following subaccounts:

(1) The Mental Health Subaccount.

(2) The Social Services Subaccount.

(3) The Health Subaccount.

(4) The CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount.

(5) The Family Support Subaccount.

(6) The Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount.

(7) The County Medical Services Program Subaccount.

(d) The Sales Tax Growth Account shall have all of the following subaccounts:

(1) The Caseload Subaccount.

(2) The County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount.

(3) The General Growth Subaccount.

(e) The Vehicle License Fee Growth Account shall have all of the following subaccounts:

(1) The County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount.

(2) The General Growth Subaccount.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Local Revenue Fund is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the purpose of this chapter.

(g) Moneys in the Local Revenue Fund shall be invested in the Surplus Money Investment Fund and all interest earned shall be distributed in January and July among the accounts and subaccounts in proportion to the amounts deposited into
 each subaccount.

(h) This section shall be operative on August 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 30) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 31.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.   Section operative August 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17600.10.

(a) Each county and city and county receiving sales tax and vehicle license fee funds in accordance with this chapter shall establish and maintain a local health and welfare trust fund comprised of the following accounts:

(1) The mental health account.

(2) The social services account.

(3) The health account.

(4) The CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount.

(5) The family support account.

(b) Each
 city receiving funds in accordance with this chapter shall establish and maintain a local health and welfare trust fund comprised of a health account and a mental health account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 32.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17600.15.

(a) Of the sales tax proceeds from revenues collected in the 1991–92 fiscal year that are deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, 51.91 percent shall be credited to the Mental Health Subaccount, 36.17 percent shall be credited to the Social Services Subaccount, and 11.92 percent shall be credited to the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account.

(b) For the 1992–93 fiscal year to the 2011–12 fiscal year, inclusive, of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make monthly deposits to the Mental Health Subaccount, the Social Services Subaccount, and the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities
 and counties’ mental health accounts, social services accounts, and health accounts, respectively, of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account. Any excess sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be deposited in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(c) (1) For the 2012–13 fiscal year, of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make monthly deposits to the Social Services Subaccount and the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ social services accounts and health accounts, respectively, of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year
 pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(2) For the 2012–13 fiscal year, of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make monthly deposits to the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, and any additional amounts above the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account. The Controller shall not include in this calculation any funding deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.9 of the Government Code
 or funds described in subdivision (c) of Section 17601.25.

(3) Any excess sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) and (2) are made shall be deposited in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(d) (1) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make monthly deposits pursuant to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance, which shall provide deposits to the Social Services Subaccount and the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ social services accounts and health accounts, respectively, of the local health and welfare trust
 funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(2) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make monthly deposits to the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, and any additional amounts above the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account. The Controller shall not include in this calculation any funding deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section
 30027.9 of the Government Code or funds described in subdivision (c) of Section 17601.25.

(3) Any excess sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) and (2) are made shall be deposited in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(4) On a monthly basis, pursuant to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds from the Social Services Subaccount to the Health Subaccount in an amount that shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) for the 2013–14 fiscal year. The funds so transferred shall not be used in calculating future year deposits to the Social Services Subaccount or the Health Subaccount.

(e) For the 2014–15 fiscal year through the
 2016–17 fiscal year, except as specified in paragraph (5), of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make the following monthly deposits:

(1) To the Social Services Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was deposited to the Social Services Subaccount in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section, in addition to the amounts that were allocated to the social services accounts of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(2) To the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was deposited to the Health Subaccount in the prior year from the Sales Tax Account in addition to the amounts that were allocated to the health accounts of the
 local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(3) To the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount until the deposits equal the amounts that were deposited in the prior fiscal year from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(4) To the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, and any additional amounts above the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25 of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account. The Controller shall not include in this calculation
 any funding deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.9 of the Government Code or funds described in subdivision (c) of Section 17601.25.

(5) (A) Any excess sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, are made shall be deposited in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund. This subparagraph shall only apply to allocations made for the 2014–15 fiscal year.

(B) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and the 2016–17 fiscal year, any excess sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and subdivision (h) are made shall be deposited in the Sales Tax
 Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(6) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, on a monthly basis, pursuant to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds from the Social Services Subaccount to the Health Subaccount in an amount that shall not exceed one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000). The transfer schedule shall be based on the amounts that each county is receiving in vehicle license fees pursuant to this chapter. The funds so transferred shall not be used in calculating future year deposits to the Social Services Subaccount or the Health Subaccount.

(f) For the 2017–18 and 2018–19 fiscal years, of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make the following monthly deposits pursuant to a schedule developed by the Department of Finance:

(1) To the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was deposited to the Health Subaccount in the prior year from the Sales Tax Account in addition to the amounts that were allocated to the health accounts of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(2) To the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, and any additional amounts above the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25 of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account. The
 Controller shall not include in this calculation any funding deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.9 of the Government Code or funds described in subdivision (c) of Section 17601.25.

(3) To the Social Services Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account, until the deposits equal the sum of the following:

(A) The total amount that was deposited to the Social Services Subaccount in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section, in addition to the amounts that were allocated to the social services accounts of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(B) The increased amount of the County IHSS MOE for the current fiscal year pursuant to Sections 12306.16 and 12306.17 as
 determined by July 1 of that fiscal year over the County IHSS MOE for the prior fiscal year subject to the determination made in subdivision (g).

(4) To the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount until the deposits equal the amounts that were deposited in the prior fiscal year from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(5) Any excess sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and subdivision (h) are made shall be deposited in the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(g) On or before January 10 and on or before May 14, the Department of Finance shall do all of the following:

(1) Estimate the amount of sales tax revenues to be received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to be received in the current fiscal year compared to the total amount of sales tax revenues necessary to fully fund the current fiscal year bases of the County Medical Services Program Subaccount, as determined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h), and the Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Subaccount, the Social Services Subaccount, and the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account as determined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of, subdivision (f).

(2) If it is determined pursuant to paragraph (1) that there will be sufficient sales tax revenues in the current fiscal year to fully fund the current fiscal year bases, then the schedule developed by the Department of Finance pursuant to subdivision (f) will fund on a
 monthly basis as much of the increased Social Services Subaccount base identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) as the excess sales tax revenues will permit.

(3) If it is determined pursuant to paragraph (1) that there will be insufficient sales tax revenues in the current fiscal year to fully fund the current fiscal year bases, then the schedule developed by the Department of Finance pursuant to subdivision (f) will not fund the increased Social Services Subaccount base identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f), and shall ensure that the County Medical Program Services Subaccount, the Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Subaccount, the Social Services Subaccount, and the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account shall receive sales tax revenues proportionate to their current year bases as determined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) and paragraphs
 (1), (2), and (4) of, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of, subdivision (f).

(4) In no fiscal year where there is sufficient sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to fully fund the bases of the County Medical Services Program Subaccount as determined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h), and the Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Subaccount, the Social Services Subaccount, and the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount, of the Sales Tax Account, as determined by paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of, subdivision (f), shall those subaccounts receive less than those amounts.

(5) Sales tax revenues allocated pursuant to this subdivision each fiscal year shall be adjusted by the Department of Finance, pursuant to a schedule provided to the Controller, in
 consultation with the California State Association of Counties, as needed but no later than August 30 of each year, to reflect the actual sales tax revenues received for that fiscal year.

(6) This subdivision shall only be operative for the 2017–18 and 2018–19 fiscal years.

(h) For the 2019–20 fiscal year and for every fiscal year thereafter, of the sales tax proceeds from revenues deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, the Controller shall make the following monthly deposits pursuant to a schedule developed by the Department of Finance:

(1) To the Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was deposited to the Health Subaccount in the prior fiscal year from the Sales Tax Account in addition to the amounts that were allocated to the health accounts of the
 local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(2) To the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account until the deposits equal the amounts that were allocated to counties’, cities’, and cities and counties’ CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccounts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25, and any additional amounts above the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17601.25 of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account. The Controller shall not include in this calculation any funding deposited in the Mental Health Subaccount from the Support Services Growth Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.9 of the Government Code or funds described in subdivision (c) of Section 17601.25.

(3) To the Social Services Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account, until the deposits equal the total amount that was deposited to the Social Services Subaccount in the prior fiscal year from the prior fiscal year from the Sales Tax Account, in addition to the amounts that were allocated to the social services accounts of the local health and welfare trust funds in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this chapter from the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(4) To the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount until the deposits equal the amounts that were deposited in the prior fiscal year from the Sales Tax Account and the Sales Tax Growth Account.

(5) Any excess sales tax revenues received pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code after the allocations required by paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, are made shall be deposited in the
 Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund.

(i) (1) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, the allocations to the County Medical Services Program Subaccount shall equal the amounts received in the prior fiscal year by the County Medical Services Program from the Sales Tax Account and the County Medical Services Program Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund, as adjusted by the calculations required under subdivision (a) of Section 17600.50.

(2) For the 2016–17 fiscal year and for every fiscal year thereafter, the allocations to the County Medical Services Program Subaccount shall equal the amounts received in the prior fiscal year by the County Medical Services Program Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account and the County Medical Services Program Growth Subaccount of the Sales Tax Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund, as adjusted
 by the calculations required under subdivision (a) of Section 17600.50.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 108.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17600.20.

(a) Excluding funds allocated to the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount and the family support account, any county, city, or city and county may reallocate money among accounts in the local health and welfare trust fund, not to exceed 10 percent of the amount deposited in the account from which the funds are reallocated for that fiscal year.

(b) After depositing funds to the social services account allocated to a county or city and county pursuant to Section 17605 and after reallocating funds from both the health account and mental health account of the local health and welfare trust fund under subdivision (a), a county may reallocate up to an additional 10 percent of the
 money from the health account to the social services account in the 1992–93 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, for caseload increases for mandated social services programs listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17605 in excess of revenue growth in the social services account.

(c) (1) A county, city, or city and county shall, at a regularly scheduled public hearing of its governing body, document that any decision to make any substantial change in its allocation of mental health, social services, or health trust fund moneys among services, facilities, programs, or providers as a result of reallocating funds pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (d) was based on the most cost-effective use of available resources to maximize client outcomes.

(2) Any county or city and county that reallocates funds pursuant to subdivision (b) shall document,
 at a regularly scheduled public hearing of the board of supervisors, that the net social services caseload has increased beyond the revenue growth in the social services account.

(3) Any county, city, or city and county that is required to document any reallocation of funds pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall forward a copy of the documentation to the Controller. The Controller shall make copies of the documentation available to the Legislature and to other interested parties, upon request.

(d) In addition to subdivision (a), a county or city and county may reallocate up to an additional 10 percent of the money from the social services account to the mental health account or the health account in the 1993–94 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter when there exist in the social services account revenues in excess of the amount necessary to fund mandated caseload costs,
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17605, as determined by the county board of supervisors, as a result of implementation of personal care services or other program changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 24, Sec. 8.   (AB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17600.50.

(a) For fiscal years prior to the 2019–20 fiscal year, a county that participated in the County Medical Services Program in the 2011–12 fiscal year, including the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Kings, Lake, Lassen, Madera, Marin, Mariposa, Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Napa, Nevada, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, and Yuba and the Governing Board of the County Medical Services Program, shall adopt resolutions by January 22, 2014, that confirm acceptance for the following approach to determining payments to the Family Support Subaccount:

(1) The amount of payments to the Family Support Subaccount shall be equal to 60 percent of
 the sum of the following:

(A) The 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to the counties listed in this subdivision pursuant to Section 17603 and the maintenance of effort in subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10 for these counties, as those sections read on January 1, 2012, Sections 17604 and 17606.20, as those sections read on August 1, 2017, and Section 17606.10, as it read on July 1, 2013.

(B) The 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to the County Medical Services Program pursuant to Sections 17603 and 17605.07, as those sections read on January 1, 2012, and Sections 17604 and 17606.20, as those sections read on August 1, 2017.

(2) The payment computed in paragraph (1) shall be achieved through the following:

(A) Each county listed in this subdivision shall pay the amounts otherwise payable to the County Medical Services Program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 16809 to the Family Support Subaccount.

(B) The County Medical Services Program shall pay the difference between the total computed in paragraph (1) and the amount calculated in subparagraph (A) from funds provided pursuant to this code.

(b) For the 2019–20 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, until the Department of Finance determines that the total reserves of the County Medical Services Program are projected to fall below an amount totaling two fiscal years of total expenditures pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), payments to the Family Support Subaccount shall be equal to the sum of the following:

(1) (A) For the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Kings, Lake, Lassen, Madera, Marin, Mariposa, Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Napa, Nevada, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, and Yuba the amount otherwise payable to the County Medical Services Program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 16809.

(B) For the County of Yolo, the amount otherwise payable to the County Medical Services Program pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 16809.

(2) The 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to the governing board of the County Medical Services Program pursuant to Sections 17603 and 17605.07, as
 those sections read on January 1, 2012, Section 17604, as it read on August 1, 2017, and Section 17606.20, as it read on August 1, 2019.

(c) (1) The payment computed in subdivision (b) shall become inoperative for the fiscal year immediately following the determination of the Department of Finance that the total reserves of the County Medical Services Program are projected to fall below an amount totaling two fiscal years of total expenditures.

(2) Beginning the fiscal year immediately following the Department of Finance’s determination pursuant to paragraph (1), and each fiscal year thereafter, for a county that participated in the County Medical Services Program in the 2019–20 fiscal year, including the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Kings, Lake, Lassen, Madera, Marin, Mariposa,
 Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Napa, Nevada, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba, and for the governing board of the County Medical Services Program, the following approach shall be utilized to determine payments to the Family Support Subaccount:

(A) The amount of payments to the Family Support Subaccount shall be equal to 60 percent of the sum of the following:

(i) The 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to the counties listed in this subdivision pursuant to Section 17603 and the maintenance of effort in subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10 for these counties, as those sections read on January 1, 2012, Sections 17604 and 17606.20, as those sections read on August 1, 2017, and Section 17606.10, as it read on July 1, 2013.

(ii) The 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to the County Medical Services Program pursuant to Sections 17603 and 17605.07, as those sections read on January 1, 2012, and Sections 17604 and 17606.20, as those sections read on August 1, 2017.

(3) The payment computed in paragraph (2) shall be achieved through the following:

(A) Each county listed in paragraph (2) shall pay the amounts otherwise payable to the County Medical Services Program pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 16809 to the Family Support Subaccount.

(B) The County Medical Services Program shall pay the difference between the total computed in paragraph (2) and the amount calculated in subparagraph (A) from funds provided pursuant
 to this code.

(d) The Counties of Fresno, Merced, Orange, Placer, Sacramento, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Cruz, Stanislaus, Tulare, and Yolo shall each tentatively inform the state by November 1, 2013, which of the following options it selects for determining its payments to the Family Support Subaccount. On or before January 22, 2014, the board of supervisors of each county and city and county may adopt a resolution informing the state of the county’s or city and county’s final selection of the option for determining its payments to the Family Support Subaccount:

(1) The formula detailed in Article 13 (commencing with Section 17613.1).

(2) (A) A calculation of 60 percent of the total of 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to that county or
 city and county pursuant to Section 17603, as it read on January 1, 2012, Sections 17604 and 17606.20, as those sections read on August 1, 2017, and Section 17606.10, as it read on July 1, 2013, and 60 percent of the maintenance of effort in subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10, as it read on January 1, 2012.

(B) If a county’s maintenance of effort in subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10 is greater than 14.6 percent of the total value of the county’s 2010–11 allocation pursuant to Sections 17603, 17604, 17606.10, and 17606.20 and subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10, the value of the maintenance of effort used in the calculation in subparagraph (A) shall be limited to 14.6 percent.

(e) The Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Kern, Los Angeles, Monterey, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Francisco, San Joaquin, San Mateo, Santa Clara, and Ventura shall each tentatively inform the state by
 November 1, 2013, which of the following options it selects for determining its payments to the Family Support Subaccount. On or before January 22, 2014, the board of supervisors of each county and city and county may adopt a resolution informing the state of the county’s or city and county’s final selection of the option for determining its payments to the Family Support Subaccount:

(1) The formula detailed in Article 12 (commencing with Section 17612.1).

(2) (A) A calculation of 60 percent of the total of 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to that county or city and county pursuant to Section 17603, as it read on January 1, 2012, Sections 17604 and 17606.20, as those sections read on August 1, 2017, and Section 17606.10, as it read on July 1, 2013, and 60 percent of the maintenance of effort in subdivision (a) of Section
 17608.10, as it read on January 1, 2012.

(B) If a county’s maintenance of effort in subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10 is greater than 25.9 percent of the total value of the county’s 2010–11 fiscal year allocation pursuant to Sections 17603, 17604, 17606.10, and 17606.20, and subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10, the value of the maintenance of effort used in the calculation in subparagraph (A) shall be limited to 25.9 percent.

(f) (1) If the board of supervisors of a county or city and county fails to adopt a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), as applicable, or fails to inform the Director of Health Care Services of the city and county’s or county’s final selection, by January 22, 2014, the calculation shall be 62.5 percent of the total of 1991 health realignment funds that would have otherwise been allocated to that county or city and county
 pursuant to Sections 17603, 17604, and 17606.20, as those sections read on January 1, 2012, and Section 17606.10, as it read on July 1, 2013, and 62.5 percent of the maintenance of effort in subdivision (a) of Section 17608.10, as it read on January 1, 2012.
